California, session 20252026, AB364.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. This act shall be known, and may be cited, as the Stop Foreign Governments from Accessing Californians’ Sensitive Personal Information Act.SECTION 1.SEC. 2. Section 1798.100 of the Civil Code is amended to read:1798.100. General Duties of Businesses that Collect Personal Information(a) A business that controls the collection of a consumer’s personal information shall, at or before the point of collection, inform a consumer of all of the following:(1) The categories of personal information to be collected, the purposes for which the categories of personal information are collected or used, and whether that personal information is sold or shared. A business shall not collect additional categories of personal information or use personal information collected for additional purposes that are incompatible with the disclosed purpose for which the personal information was collected without providing the consumer with notice consistent with this section.(2) If the business collects sensitive personal information, the categories of sensitive personal information to be collected and the purposes for which the categories of sensitive personal information are collected or used, and whether that information is sold or shared. A business shall not collect additional categories of sensitive personal information or use sensitive personal information collected for additional purposes that are incompatible with the disclosed purpose for which the sensitive personal information was collected without providing the consumer with notice consistent with this section.(3) The length of time the business intends to retain each category of personal information, including sensitive personal information, or if that is not possible, the criteria used to determine that period provided that a business shall not retain a consumer’s personal information or sensitive personal information for each disclosed purpose for which the personal information was collected for longer than is reasonably necessary for that disclosed purpose.(4) If the business intends to maintain the consumer’s personal information outside of the United States.(b) A business that, acting as a third party, controls the collection of personal information about a consumer may satisfy its obligation under subdivision (a) by providing the required information prominently and conspicuously on the homepage home page of its internet website. In addition, if a business acting as a third party controls the collection of personal information about a consumer on its premises, including in a vehicle, then the business shall, at or before the point of collection, inform consumers as to the categories of personal information to be collected and the purposes for which the categories of personal information are used, and whether that personal information is sold, in a clear and conspicuous manner at the location.(c) A business’ collection, use, retention, and sharing of a consumer’s personal information shall be reasonably necessary and proportionate to achieve the purposes for which the personal information was collected or processed, or for another disclosed purpose that is compatible with the context in which the personal information was collected, and not further processed in a manner that is incompatible with those purposes.(d) A business that collects a consumer’s personal information and that sells that personal information to, or shares it with, a third party or that discloses it to a service provider or contractor for a business purpose shall enter into an agreement with the third party, service provider, or contractor, that:(1) Specifies that the personal information is sold or disclosed by the business only for limited and specified purposes.(2) Obligates the third party, service provider, or contractor to comply with applicable obligations under this title and obligate those persons to provide the same level of privacy protection as is required by this title.(3) Grants the business rights to take reasonable and appropriate steps to help ensure that the third party, service provider, or contractor uses the personal information transferred in a manner consistent with the business’ obligations under this title.(4) Requires the third party, service provider, or contractor to notify the business if it makes a determination that it can no longer meet its obligations under this title.(5) Grants the business the right, upon notice, including under paragraph (4), to take reasonable and appropriate steps to stop and remediate unauthorized use of personal information.(e) A business that collects a consumer’s personal information shall implement reasonable security procedures and practices appropriate to the nature of the personal information to protect the personal information from unauthorized or illegal access, destruction, use, modification, or disclosure in accordance with Section 1798.81.5.(f) Nothing in this section shall require a business to disclose trade secrets, as specified in regulations adopted pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 1798.185.SEC. 2.SEC. 3. Section 1798.122 is added to the Civil Code, to read:1798.122. (a) A business shall not maintain a consumer’s personal information outside of the United States unless all of the following are true:(1) The business has informed the consumer of potential risks associated with the business maintaining the consumer’s personal information outside of the United States.(2) The consumer explicitly consented to the business maintaining the consumer’s personal information outside of the United States.(3) The personal information is not health care information, financial information, or geolocation data.(b) A business shall not maintain personal information that is health care information, financial information, or geolocation data in the custody of a foreign government or a third party that is owned or controlled by a foreign government.SEC. 3.SEC. 4. The Legislature finds and declares that this act furthers the purposes and intent of the California Privacy Rights Act of 2020.